zh-CN: 桅杆直径类型: MDM; RDM; SDM; 其他
nb: Mastens diametertype: MDM; RDM; SDM; Annet
ko: 마스트 직경 유형: MDM; RDM; SDM; 기타
nl: Mast diameter type: MDM; RDM; SDM; Overige
zh-TW: 桅杆直徑類型: MDM; RDM; SDM; 其他
fr: Catégorie de diamètre du mât: MDM; RDM; SDM; Autre
sk-SK: Typ priemeru sťažňa: MDM; RDM; SDM; Iný
cs: Typ průměru stožáru: MDM; RDM; SDM; Jiné
pt-PT: Tipo de diâmetro do mastro: MDM; RDM; SDM; Outro
pl: Typ średnicy masztu: MDM; RDM; SDM; Inne
sv: Mastdiametertyp: MDM; RDM; SDM; Annat
de: Mastdurchmessertyp: MDM; RDM; SDM; Sonstiges
ru: Тип диаметра мачты: MDM; RDM; SDM; Другое
ja: マスト径タイプ: MDM; RDM; SDM; その他
da: Mastdiametertype: MDM; RDM; SDM; Andet
el: Τύπος διαμέτρου ιστού: MDM; RDM; SDM; Άλλο
en: Mast diameter type: MDM; RDM; SDM; Other
sl-SI: Vrsta premera jamborja: MDM; RDM; SDM; Drugo
bg-BG: Тип диаметър на мачтата: MDM; RDM; SDM; Друго
pt-BR: Mastro tipo de diâmetro: MDM; RDM; SDM; Outro
th: ประเภทเส้นผ่านศูนย์กลางเสา: MDM; RDM; SDM; อื่นๆ
es: Tipo de diámetro del mástil: MDM; RDM; SDM; Otro
vi: Loại đường kính cột: MDM; RDM; SDM; Khác
hr-HR: Vrsta promjera jarbola: MDM; RDM; SDM; Ostalo
it: Tipo di diametro dell'albero: MDM; RDM; SDM; Altro
ro-RO: Tipul diametrului catargului: MDM; RDM; SDM; Altele
hu: Árbóc átmérőtípusa: MDM; RDM; SDM; Egyéb
tr: Direk çapı tipi: MDM; RDM; SDM; Diğer
lt-LT: Stiebo skersmens tipas: MDM; RDM; SDM; Kita
fi: Maston halkaisijan tyyppi: MDM; RDM; SDM; Muu